Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 3. Executive
Executive Order No. 3-47
(No. 06-06) [Vermont State Craft Center Overview Commission.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order 09-09 (codified as Executive Order No. 3-49), dated October 15, 2009.

Executive Order No. 3-48
(No. 01-09) [Merger of Department of Housing and Community Affairs and Department of Economic Development within the Agency of Commerce and Community Development.

Revoked by Executive Order 01-13 (codified as Executive Order No. 3-56), dated January 11, 2013.

Executive Order No. 3-49
(No. 09-09) [Vermont State Craft Center Overview Commission.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 12-12 (codified as Executive Order No. 9-2), dated October 31, 2012.

Executive Order No. 3-50
(No. 10-09) [Rescinding Certain Executive Orders.

WHEREAS, the Governor has the power under 3 V.S.A., chapter 41 to alter the organization of the Executive Branch through use of the Executive Order; and

WHEREAS, the Executive Order has been used over the years for a variety of purposes, including the creation of certain boards, councils and commissions, and the reorganization of the Executive Branch; and

WHEREAS, these orders are of continuous effect unless expressly limited in duration, or revoked, rescinded or superseded; and

WHEREAS, certain executive orders are either no longer useful, no longer effective, or have been superseded by legislative enactment, and yet remain in existence.

NOW, THEREFORE, I, James H. Douglas, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby revoke and rescind the following Executive Orders:

Executive Order 68-88 (codified as #10-10) dated November 17, 1988 (State Agencies Designated as Having Programs Affecting Land Use or Exempted from Compliance with all Provisions of Growth Management Act of 1988 (Act 200); Establishment of and Reports
to State Agency Planning Implementation Committee);

Executive Order 70-89 (codified as #3-15) dated January 13, 1989 (Abolition of Office on Aging and Transfer of Functions of Certain Divisions to and Establishment of Department of Rehabilitation and Aging);

Executive Order 97-90 (codified as #22-3) dated November 22, 1990 (Governor’s Advisory Commission on Native American Affairs);

Executive Order 99-90 (codified as #10-14) dated December 31, 1990 (Approval of Interim State Agency Land Use Plans);

Executive Order 13-91 (codified as #10-16) dated November 21, 1991 (State Agencies Designated as Having Programs Affecting Land Use in Compliance with Provisions of Growth Management Act of 1988 (Act 200); Establishment of and Reports to State Agency
Implementation Committee);

Executive Order 01-99 (codified as #21-6) dated February 1, 1999 (Vermont State Workforce Investment Board);

Executive Order 12-03 (codified as #5-5) dated August 5, 2003 (Vermont Transportation Operations Council);

Executive Order 17A-03 (codified as #13-3) dated November 17, 2003 (Governor’s Commission on Corrections Overcrowding);

Executive Order 02-04 (codified as #10-31) dated April 8, 2004 (Vermont Clean State Program);

Executive Order 04-06 (codified as #15-8) dated June 29, 2006 (Creation of the Vermont Council on Domestic Violence);

Executive Order 08-06 (codified as #30-9) dated November 4, 2006 (Statewide Telecommunications Advancement);

Executive Order 01-07 (codified as #13-4) dated February 9, 2007 (Vermont Victim/Survivor Crime Council).

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated December 23, 2009

Executive Order No. 3-51
(No. 01-10) [Transfer of Certain Personnel Positions Within State Government
to the Department of Human Resources.

WHEREAS, the Governor, pursuant to

3 V.S.A. § 2001
, may make such changes in the organization of the executive branch or in the assignment of functions among its units as he considers necessary for efficient administration; and

WHEREAS, it is desirable to reorganize the departments and divisions of government by better coordinating certain activities and improve the coordination and effectiveness of services to the public; and

WHEREAS, the Governor, pursuant to

3 V.S.A. § 209
, may transfer, temporarily or permanently, subordinates of any one department to another, as the needs of the State require and shall “provide for and require a practical working system to insure efficiency and mutual
helpfulness among the departments” of State government; and

WHEREAS, the Department of Human Resources is required to provide for centralized human resources management,

3 V.S.A. § 2283(a)
, and to administer the State of Vermont’s workforce, including personnel administration, labor relations, workforce training, and benefits,

3 V.S.A. § 309
et seq.; and

WHEREAS, presently, personnel functions are performed by employees within state agencies and departments who are not subject to the authority of the Department of Human Resources; and

WHEREAS, the State could improve and enhance its ability to provide services to the public through the transfer of all personnel functions and associated positions within agencies and departments to the Department of Human Resources.

NOW, THEREFORE, I, James H. Douglas, by virtue of the power vested in me by 3 V.S.A., chapter 41 as Governor, do hereby:

Transfer, effective July 1, 2010, the following positions and incumbents from the Agencies and Departments designated below to the Department of Human Resources:

Position #
Position Title and Agency/Department

Administration

040518 AoA Human Resource Director

040519 Personnel Administrator D

040520 Personnel Administrator D

Human Services

720005 Human Services Personnel Chief

720020 Personnel Administrator D

720016 HR Coordinator

720009 Personnel Administrator D

720018 HR Coordinator

720026 AHS Personnel Assistant

720017 Corrections Human Resources Administrator

720107 AHS Personnel Assistant

720019 Personnel Administrator B

720023 AHS Personnel Assistant

620004 VVH Human Resources Administrator

620179 Personnel Administrator A

720057 AHS Investigation Chief

720056 AHS Investigator

720055 AHS Investigator

Natural Resources

630071 Agency Human Resources Chief

630017 Human Resources Technician

630016 Personnel Administrator C

Transportation

860549 AOT Human Resources Chief

860304 AOT Human Resources Manager

860461 Personnel Administrator C

860003 Personnel Administrator D

860685 Personnel Administrator C

860285 Human Resources Administrator

861702 AOT Human Resources Spec III

861263 Personnel Administrator B

860935 Personnel Administrator D

860118 Personnel Administrator D

860275 AOT Investigator

BISHCA

290089 Personnel Administrator C

Education

770187 Education Human Resource Administrator

Labor

820429 VT DOL Human Resource Admin

820464 Personnel Administrator C

820087 Administrative Assistant B

Military

320105 Personnel Administrator D

Public Safety

330121 Pub Safety Human Resources Manager

330310 Personnel Administrator C

Liquor Control

310002 Personnel Administrator B

Lottery

800012 Personnel Administrator A

Transfer, effective July 1, 2010, any and all appropriations associated with the above listed positions from the affected Agencies and Departments to the Department of Human Resources.

Transfer, effective July 1, 2010, the functions, equipment, supplies and inventory associated with the above listed positions from the affected Agencies and Departments to the Department of Human Resources.

Direct the Commissioner of the Department of Human Resources to define the position duties and take appropriate classification actions prior to the effective date of the transfer. The Commissioner shall also take, with the assistance of the Agency Secretaries
and Department Commissioners affected by the transfer, any and all necessary actions to organize, plan and effect an orderly transfer and transition.

This Executive Order shall be submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to

3 V.S.A. § 2002(b)
and shall take effect on April 16, 2010, unless disapproved by resolution of the General Assembly.

Dated January 14, 2010.

Executive Order No. 3-52
(No. 04-10) [Interagency Committee on Administrative Rules.

WHEREAS, Section 820 of Title 3 of Vermont Statutes Annotated created an Interagency Committee on Administrative Rules (ICAR); and

WHEREAS, members of ICAR shall be appointed by the Governor from the executive branch of state government and serve at his pleasure; and

WHEREAS, the functions and duties of ICAR are those established by law and include “review of existing and proposed rules of agencies designated by the Governor for style, consistency with the law, legislative intent and the policies of the Governor;”
and

WHEREAS, the functions and duties of ICAR may also include duties and responsibilities directed by the Governor; and

WHEREAS, Section 49 of Act 149 of 2002 (Adj. Sess.) amended the laws pertaining to rule-making to require that all rules be pre-filed with ICAR; and

WHEREAS, these amendments to law necessitate the updating of the current executive orders relating to ICAR.

NOW, THEREFORE, I, James H. Douglas, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont do hereby order the following with respect to the functions and duties of the Interagency Committee on Administrative Rules and the responsibilities
of state agencies and departments who initiate rulemaking:

No state agency or department shall initiate rulemaking under chapter 25 of Title 3 (the Administrative Procedures Act) without first pre-filing the rule with ICAR.

Prior to adopting emergency rules in accordance with

3 V.S.A. § 844
, agencies and departments of state government shall submit the emergency rules to the Chair of ICAR for a determination of appropriateness by the Chair.

The Secretary of Administration or his or her designee shall serve as Chair of ICAR. Members of ICAR shall be appointed by the Governor from the executive branch and shall serve at his or her pleasure.

This Executive Order supersedes and replaces Executive Orders No. 14-78 (codified as E.O. 3-3), dated April 7, 1978 and No. 56-88 (codified as E.O. 3-14), dated January 8, 1988.

This order shall take effect on July 1, 2010.

Dated July 2, 2010.

Executive Order No. 3-53
(No. 09-11) [Executive Code of Ethics.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 3-84 (codified as Executive Order No. 19-17), dated December 4, 2017.

Executive Order No. 3-54
(No. 01-12) Addendum to Executive Order No. 02-09 [Renaming Vermont Commission on National and Community Service.

The Vermont Commission on National and Community Service, originally established by Executive Order No. 09-98, and presently governed by Executive Order No. 02-09, is hereby renamed SerVermont.

This Order shall amend Executive Order 02-09 (codified as No. 33-18), and shall take effect upon signing.

Dated January 17, 2012.

Executive Order No. 3-55
(No. 04-12) [Protection of Vermont State Hospital Employees Subject to a Reduction in Force Due to Tropical Storm Irene.

WHEREAS, the Department of Human Resources has provided official notice to the Vermont State Employees Association (“VSEA”) and affected employees that 80 state employees who worked at the Vermont State Hospital (“VSH”) in Waterbury will be separated
from state service effective April 13, 2012;

WHEREAS, the Secretary of Administration and the Department of Human Resources have worked with the VSEA over the last few months to mitigate the impact of the reduction in force; and

WHEREAS, The Governor, the House, and the Senate have all worked diligently to support and protect these employees and will work to provide as many opportunities for state employment as is mutually possible.

NOW THEREFORE BE IT RESOLVED THAT I, Peter Shumlin, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor, do hereby establish and order as follows:

Mitigation of the impact of the reduction in force to affected employees

A. The Job Offer Program:
The Department of Human Resources and VSEA negotiated a pre-RIF jobs program that permits Vermont State Hospital employees to receive mandatory offers of employment to other positions in the Agency of Human Services
prior to any actual reduction in force (the Job Offer Program). As part of the Job Offer Program, the Department of Human Resources hosted several informational meetings and a day-long event where employees could meet with
recruitment counselors to get additional information about the program and the potential jobs available. (To date, 41 employees elected to participate in the program and 11 found new employment in the Agency of Human Services.)

B. Reemployment Rights, Benefits, and Trainings for Vermont State Hospital Employees Subject to the Reduction in Force:

a.
The Department of Human Resources will hold a number of meetings at which information concerning reemployment rights, retirement options, benefits continuation, the employees’ assistance program, unemployment insurance
and job training opportunities will be addressed. The Department of Human Resources will hold job fair meetings for impacted employees to provide information about existing job openings and assist employees with applying for
these jobs.

b.
The Vermont Department of Labor will assist the Department of Human Resources by identifying available federal and state training funds and grant opportunities to assist with skill assessment, job retraining, job
development, on-the-job and apprenticeship programs, and other reemployment assistance to the affected employees.

c.
The Departments of Human Resources and Labor will coordinate to hold job fair meetings for impacted employees to provide information about existing job openings and assist employees with applying for those jobs.

d.
The Administration is committed to working diligently with the VSEA to place VSH employees subject to the RIF in jobs within state government in accordance with the terms of the applicable collective bargaining
agreements.

C. Mandatory Job Offers to Employees Who Continue to Work for State Government:
The Department of Human Resources also worked with the VSEA to address the rights that Vermont State Hospital employees may have for reemployment at any successor State Hospital. The Department and VSEA negotiated
language that is included in H.630 to give any VSH employee subject to the RIF, but later rehired by state government, the opportunity to return to their prior job when the new state hospital opens, subject to seniority and
other contract rights and obligations.

D. Mandatory Job Offers to Employees Who Leave State Government and Wish to Return:
In addition, for displaced employees who take jobs outside state government, the proposed language extends reemployment rights under the collective bargaining agreements until one year after the opening of the
successor facility. In this way, VSH employees who are no longer employed by state government will have reemployment possibilities at any successor hospital.

E. Posting of Job Openings:
The Department of Human Resources shall post all open positions that involve providing care to individuals with mental health conditions that are provided to the Department by participating hospitals developing
inpatient, secure residential, and intensive residential recovery services.

Effective Date

This Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated February 29, 2012.

Executive Order No. 3-56
(No. 01-13) [Revocation of Executive Order 3-48 and Renaming the Department of Housing and Community Affairs the Department of Housing and Community Development.

WHEREAS, the Governor, pursuant to

3 V.S.A. § 2001
, may make such changes in the organization of the executive branch or in the assignment of functions among its units as he considers necessary for efficient administration; and

WHEREAS, via Executive Order 3-48 (No. 1-09), Governor James H. Douglas, with the approval of the General Assembly pursuant to

3 V.S.A. § 2002
, merged the Department of Housing and Community Affairs with the Department of Economic Development within the Agency of Commerce and Community Development; and

WHEREAS, the merger of these two departments with the Agency of Commerce and Community Development is no longer deemed to be in the best interest of the State;

NOW THEREFORE, I, Peter Shumlin, by the power vested in me as Governor, do revoke Executive Order 3-48 and rename the Department of Housing and Community Affairs the Department of Housing and Community Development.

This Executive Order shall take effect on April 12, 2013, or before final adjournment of the annual session, whichever comes first, unless disapproved by the General Assembly pursuant to

3 V.S.A. § 2002
. This Executive Order shall be submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to

3 V.S.A. § 2002
(b)

.

Dated January 11, 2013.

Executive Order No. 3-57
(No. 02-13) [Transfer of Certain Technology Positions to the Department of Information and Innovation.

WHEREAS, the Governor, pursuant to

3 V.S.A. § 209
and

3 V.S.A. § 2001
, may make changes in the organization of the executive branch as he considers necessary for efficient administration; and

WHEREAS, the State could improve and enhance its ability to provide services to the public through the transfer of certain technology support positions from the Agency of Human Services (AHS) to the Department of Information and Innovation (DII);

NOW THEREFORE, I, Peter Shumlin, by the power vested in me as Governor, do hereby:

Transfer, effective July 1, 2013, the following positions and incumbents from AHS to DII:

Click to view

Transfer, effective July 1, 2013, the functions, equipment, supplies and inventory associated with the above listed positions from AHS to DII. Any and all appropriations will remain with AHS, as DII will charge AHS for services consumed.

Direct the Commissioner of DII to define the position duties and take appropriate classification actions through the Department of Human Resources prior to the effective date of the transfer. The Commissioner shall also take, with the assistance of the
Agency Secretaries and Department Commissioners affected by the transfer, any and all necessary actions to organize, plan and affect an orderly transfer and transition.

This Executive Order shall take effect on April 12, 2013, or before final adjournment of the annual session, whichever comes first, unless disapproved by the General Assembly pursuant to

3 V.S.A. § 2002
. This Executive Order shall be submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to

3 V.S.A. § 2002
(b)

.

Dated January 11, 2013.

Position No. HR Title 1 720084 IT Specialist I 2 720086 IT Sys Admin 3 720085 IT Specialist III 4 720003 Help Desk Sp II 5 720065 Network Admin II 6 720150 IT Security 7 720130 AHS Security Director 8 720083 IT Specialist II 9 720106 IT Specialist II
10 720098 Agency IT Procurement Services Specialist 11 720105 IT Specialist II 12 720059 Network Admin III 13 720087 Network Admin III 14 720090 IT Specialist II 15 750516 IT Specialist III 16 720104 Help Desk Sp II 17 720089 IT Specialist
I 18 720093 IT Specialist II 19 720102 Network Admin II 20 720096 IT Specialist II 21 720082 IT Manager I 22 720100 IT Sys Admin 23 720103 IT Specialist II 24 720094 Network Admin II 25 720092 IT Sys Admin 26 720095 Network Admin II

Executive Order No. 3-58
(No. 03-13) [Governor’s Business Advisory Council on Health Care Financing.

Expired by its own terms, effective July 15, 2015.

Executive Order No. 3-59
(No. 10-13) [Governor’s Workforce Equity and Diversity Council and Development of an Equal Employment Opportunity Program.

WHEREAS, the State of Vermont is an employer committed to the practice of equal opportunity in all aspects of employment in state government, and

WHEREAS, the State of Vermont is committed to promoting equal employment opportunities by identifying obstacles to employment and career advancement, and endeavoring to remove those obstacles without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex,
sexual orientation, gender identity, ancestry, place of birth, age, physical or mental condition, or HIV status, and

WHEREAS, the Department of Human Resources is developing a statewide Workforce Planning process that will reflect the benefits of diversity and promote a talented and skilled workforce.

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED that I, Peter Shumlin, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby re-establish and re-constitute the “Governor’s Workforce Equity and Diversity Council” and order as follows.

Composition, Appointments, and Process.

The Council shall have up to fifteen members, including:

— The Commissioner of Human Resources or designee,

— The Commissioner of Labor or designee,

— The Commissioner of the Department of Disabilities, Aging and Independent Living or designee,

— A representative from the Vermont State Employees’ Association,

— A representative of the Attorney General’s Office,

— A representative of the Vermont Commission on Women,

— Up to seven members of the public belonging to historically under-represented or disadvantaged groups, or working for organizations that advocate for such groups or promote the practices of equal opportunity, appointed by the Governor,

— Up to two at large members appointed by the Governor.

Each year the Council shall elect at least one member, but no more than two members, to serve as chair or co-chairs of the Council.

The term of office for Council members shall be two years, with members serving at the pleasure of the Governor. Members may be reappointed to subsequent two year terms.

The Council shall be attached to the Department of Human Resources for administrative support. To the extent funds permit, members of the Council who are not state employees shall receive a per diem pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 1010(e)
.

Charge.

The Council’s duties include but are not limited to the following:

A.
Consult with and advise the Commissioner of Human Resources and the Secretary of Administration regarding development, implementation, and the maintenance of the state’s Equal Employment Opportunity and Diversity
Program(s), and shall report on the integration of diversity issues with statewide planning and development efforts;

B.
Meet on a regular basis to ensure ongoing coordination of efforts, monitoring of activities against goals and objectives, and compliance with applicable federal and state laws, mandates, and union contracts, and

C.
The Council may establish ad hoc subcommittees and appoint advisors as needed to address specific issues that may arise.

In addition, the Commissioner of Human Resources, with the assistance of the Council, shall:

A.
With the approval of the Secretary of Administration, develop, implement, and monitor an Equal Employment Opportunity Program for the State of Vermont that addresses statewide diversity issues and provides support
to each state agency or department in developing and implementing individual diversity programs tailored to agency/department needs, and

B.
Work with agencies and departments in the preparation, monitoring, and enforcement of agency or department-specific equal employment opportunity and diversity programs, and

C.
Work with human resources administrators and labor relations specialists to make available appropriate training and provide support for all agencies and departments, and

D.
Ensure that equal opportunity and diversity is an integral part of workforce planning and development throughout the Executive Branch.

E.
Submit an annual report to the Governor regarding the progress of the current year’s Equal Employment Opportunity Plan and diversity initiatives by January 15th, and

F.
Submit the state’s Equal Employment Opportunity Plan for the next fiscal year by April 30th for approval by the Governor.

Effective Date.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing, shall supersede Executive Order 09-02, and shall continue in full force and effect until further order by the Governor.

Dated December 31, 2013.

Executive Order No. 3-60
(No. 01-14) [Governor’s Consumer Advisory Council on Health Care Reform.

Expired by its own terms, effective July 15, 2015.

Executive Order No. 3-61
(No. 02-14) [Governor’s Criminal Justice and Substance Abuse Cabinet.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 3-77 (codified as Executive Order No. 03-77), dated January 5, 2017.

Executive Order No. 3-62
(No. 03-14) [Governor’s Law Enforcement Officer Coordinating Council.

WHEREAS, state, county, and local police agencies play a unique role in protecting and supporting their communities;

WHEREAS, law enforcement officers are increasingly first-responders on a variety of complex social issues, from substance abuse to mental illness to family violence; and

WHEREAS, sharing of information and policy recommendations among state, county, and local police agencies and the Governor’s Administration is beneficial to the collective goal of improving public safety for all Vermonters.

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED that I, Peter Shumlin, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor, do hereby establish a Governor’s Law Enforcement Officer Coordinating Council as follows:

Composition and Process.

The Council shall consist of the President of the Sheriff’s Association or designee, the President of the Police Chiefs Association or designee, the President of the Police Association or designee, the Commissioner of Public Safety or designee, and the
Governor’s Counsel. The Council shall be chaired by the Governor’s Counsel and shall meet no less than quarterly at the call of the Chair.

Effective Date.

This Order shall take effect upon signing and shall expire on July 15, 2019.

Dated June 17, 2014

Executive Order No. 3-63
(No. 04-14) [VtSHARES Coordinating Committee.

WHEREAS, for many years Vermont state employees have joined with other citizens in support of voluntary charitable services;

WHEREAS, state employees share feelings of civic responsibility and deserve the same opportunity as their neighbors employed in the private sector or by the federal government to discharge that responsibility efficiently and with the knowledge that their
charitable contributions will be used accountably and in a way that will provide maximum benefits; and

WHEREAS, organized charitable campaigns are permitted under

29 V.S.A. § 5
.

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED that I, Peter Shumlin, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby re-establish and re-constitute the “State Employee Combined Charitable Appeal Committee” as the VtSHARES Coordinating
Committee and order as follows:

Composition, Appointments, and Process.

The VtSHARES Coordinating Committee shall consist of the Secretary of Administration and at least four other persons appointed by the Governor who will serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The Governor may delegate his appointment authority under this
Order to the Secretary of Administration.

The Committee shall be chaired by the Secretary of Administration or his or her designee. The Committee shall meet at the call of the Chair and may designate additional committees as necessary to administer the VtSHARES campaign.

The Agency of Administration shall provide administrative support to the Committee.

Charge.

The Committee shall review and, if approved by the Governor, make arrangements for the VtSHARES campaign and other such organized charitable campaigns as the Committee deems appropriate to solicit funds from state employees at their places of employment
or duty stations. In making these arrangements, the Committee shall consult with appropriate interested persons, organizations, state agencies and departments.

Upon authorization of an organized charitable campaign by the Committee, the Committee shall recommend appropriate action or authorization of the campaign by the Governor pursuant to

29 V.S.A. § 5
.

Effective Date.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated October 7, 2014

Executive Order No. 3-64
(No. 05-14) [Accessibility of Buildings Used for Public Meetings to People with Disabilities.

WHEREAS, section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 and Title II of the Americans with Disabilities Act provide that programs and buildings financed in part or in whole by a grant or loan from the federal government must be accessible to people with
disabilities;

WHEREAS, since 1981, Vermont law regarding public buildings has required that a person shall not construct or permit construction of a public building unless the specifications equal those of the American National Standards Institute and current Americans
with Disabilities Act Accessibility Guidelines related to making buildings and facilities accessible to and usable by people with physical disabilities;

WHEREAS, an estimated 92,000 Vermonters have disabling conditions that are significantly restrictive and can be exclusive unless reasonable accommodations are made;

WHEREAS, all Vermonters with disabilities should have access to and use of buildings and facilities where the functions of State Government are conducted; and

WHEREAS, it is the policy of the State of Vermont to conduct all state business in barrier-free facilities.

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED that I, Peter Shumlin, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont do hereby direct that all meetings that are open to the public where Vermont State Government business is conducted shall
be held in buildings or facilities accessible to and usable by people with disabilities.

This Order shall take effect upon signing and supersedes and replaces Executive Order 28-86 (codified as No. 29-14).

Dated October 21, 2014

Executive Order No. 3-65
(No. 07-14) [Transfer of Certain Medicaid Policy Positions to the Agency of Human Services Central Office.

WHEREAS, the Governor, pursuant to

3 V.S.A. § 209
and § 2001, may make changes in the organization of the executive branch as he considers necessary for efficient administration; and

WHEREAS, the State can improve and enhance services to Vermonters by transferring Medicaid Policy personnel from the Department of Vermont Health Access (DVHA) to the Agency of Human Services Central Office (AHS CO).

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED that I, Peter Shumlin, by the power vested in me as Governor, do hereby:

Transfer the following positions, incumbents, and associated functions, equipment, supplies and inventory, from DVHA to AHS CO:

Click to view

Direct the Secretary of AHS to define position duties and take appropriate classification actions through the Department of Human Resources. The Secretary, with the assistance of his Commissioners, shall organize, plan, and affect an orderly transfer
and transition.

This Order shall take effect on April 7, 2015, or before final adjournment of the annual session, whichever comes first, unless disapproved by the General Assembly pursuant to

3 V.S.A. § 2002
. This Order shall be submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to

3 V.S.A. § 2002
(b)

.

Dated December 19, 2014

Position No. HR Title 1 730010 DVHA Policy Director 2 730015 Health Access Policy and Planning Chief 3 730101 Health Programs Administration 4 730022 Health Programs Administrator 5 730062 Health Programs Administrator 6 730285 Health Programs Administrator
7 730104 DVHA Program Consultant

Executive Order No. 3-66
(No. 01-15) [Revocation of Certain Executive Orders.

WHEREAS, Governors have created various executive orders over the years, some of which have become obsolete by the passage of time or by other provisions of law; and

WHEREAS, Governors have periodically sought to update existing executive orders, including by revoking and rescinding orders that no longer serve the purpose for which they were enacted;

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED that I, Peter Shumlin, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby revoke and rescind the Executive Orders listed below:

Orders Revoked.

Chapter 3: Executive

Executive Order No. 01-94 (codified as No. 3-26) dated January 12, 1994 (Abolition of Department of Taxes and Creation of Department of Revenue);

Chapter 10: Conservation and Development

Executive Order No. 24-86 (codified as No. 10-8) dated June 11, 1986 (Program for Recycling of Waste Products and Revision of State Solid Waste Management Plan);

Chapter 15: Domestic Relations

Executive Order No. 16-11 (codified as No. 15-10) dated November 17, 2011 (Governor’s Prevention of Domestic and Sexual Violence Task Force);

Chapter 18: Health

Executive Order No. 12-11 (codified as No. 18-21) dated September 20, 2011 (Designation of Vermont State Hospital at Springfield, Vermont);

Chapter 20: Internal Security and Public Safety

Executive Order No. 12-85 (codified as No. 20-2) dated July 15, 1985 (Activation of Vermont National Guard for Assistance of Civilian Authorities in City of Barre);

Executive Order No. 51-87 (codified as No. 20-3) [undated] (Order Into Service of Vermont National Guardsmen for Assistance to Civilians and Authorities of State and Bennington County);

Executive Order No. 77-89 (codified as No. 20-5) dated August 8, 1989 (Declaration of State of Emergency and Activation of Emergency Disaster Preparedness Plan for Washington County);

Executive Order No. 6-91 (codified as No. 20-7) dated May 1, 1991 (Utilization of National Guard to Carry Out Vermont’s Drug Enforcement Support Plan);

Executive Order No. 3-95 (codified as No. 20-8) dated July 29, 1995 (Activation of National Guard to Assist Vermont State Police and the City of Burlington);

Executive Order No. 4-95 (codified as No. 20-9) dated August 8, 1995 (Declaration of State of Emergency for Caledonia, Chittenden, Essex, Lamoille, Orleans and Washington Counties);

Executive Order No. 5-95 (codified as No. 20-10) dated August 8, 1995 (Activation of National Guard to Assist State and Local Officials in Stabilizing Conditions Resulting From Flooding);

Executive Order No. 8-96 (codified as No. 20-11) dated January 24, 1996 (Declaration of State of Emergency and Activation of Emergency Disaster Preparedness Plan for State of Vermont);

Executive Order No. 11-96 (codified as No. 20-12) dated June 14, 1996 (Declaration of State of Emergency for Windham and Windsor Counties);

Executive Order No. 12-96 (codified as 20-13) dated June 14, 1996 (Activation of National Guard to Assist in Flood Recovery Operations in Windham County);

Executive Order No. 1-97 (codified as No. 20-14) dated July 15, 1997 (Declaration of State of Emergency for Franklin, Lamoille, and Orleans Counties);

Executive Order No. 2-97 (codified as No. 20-15) dated July 15, 1997 (Activation of National Guard to Assist in Flood Recovery Operations and Security in Franklin, Lamoille, and Orleans Counties);

Executive Order No. 1-98 (codified as 20-16) dated January 8, 1998 (Declaration of State of Emergency for Grand Isle County);

Executive Order No. 2-98 (codified as No. 20-17) dated January 8, 1998 (Activation of National Guard to Assist in Flood Recovery Operations and Security in Grand Isle County);

Executive Order No. 3-98 (codified as No. 20-18) dated January 9. 1998 (Declaration of State of Emergency for Chittenden, Franklin, and Addison Counties);

Executive Order No. 4-98 (codified as No. 20-19) dated January 9, 1998 (Activation of National Guard to Assist in Flood Recovery Operations and Security in Chittenden, Franklin, and Addison Counties);

Executive Order No. 6-98 (codified as No. 20-20) dated June 28, 1998 (Declaration of State of Emergency for Addison, Orange, Washington, and Windsor Counties);

Executive Order No. 7-98 (codified as No. 20-21) dated June 28, 1998 (Activation of National Guard to Assist in Flood Recovery Operations and Security in Addison, Orange, Washington, and Windsor Counties);

Executive Order No. 8-99 (codified as No. 20-22) dated July 8, 1999 (Declaration of State of Emergency and Activation of Emergency Disaster Preparedness Plan for Town of Springfield);

Executive Order No. 9-99 (codified as No. 20-23) dated July 8, 1999 (Activation of National Guard to Assist in Recovery Operations and Security in Town of Springfield);

Executive Order No. 5-00 (codified as No. 20-25) dated July 17, 2000 (Declaration of State of Emergency and Activation of Emergency-Disaster Preparedness Plan for Addison, Bennington, Windham and Windsor Counties);

Executive Order No. 5-02 (codified as No. 20-28) dated June 12, 2002 (Declaration of State of Emergency for the County of Caledonia);

Executive Order No. 5-05 (codified as No. 20-32) dated September 2, 2005 (Activation of National Guard to Assist in Hurricane Recovery Operations and Security in the State of Louisiana);

Executive Order No. 4-07 (codified as No. 20-34) dated April 17, 2007 (Declaration of State of Emergency and Activation of Emergency Operations Plan for State of Vermont), and addendum dated April 24, 2007;

Executive Order No. 5-08 (codified as No. 20-37) dated December 15, 2008 (Declaration of State of Emergency and Activation of Emergency Operations Plan for Bennington, Orange, Windham, and Windsor Counties), and addendum dated December 22, 2008;

Chapter 30: Public Service

Executive Order No. 56-81 (codified as No. 30-2) dated January 13, 1981 (Transfer of Energy Office From Agency of Administration to Department of Public Service);

Executive Order No. 9-94 (codified as No. 30-3) dated May 20, 1994 (Declaration of Energy Emergency with Respect to Damaged PV20 Transmission Line);

Executive Order No. 9-95 (codified as No. 30-4) dated December 28, 1995 (Extension of Declaration of Energy Emergency with Respect to Damaged PV20 Transmission Line);

Executive Order No. 10-12 (codified as No. 30-10) dated October 2, 2012 (Governor’s Energy Generation Siting Policy Commission);

Chapter 32: Taxation and Finance

Executive Order No. 32-86 (codified as No. 32-1) dated November 6, 1986 (Allocation of 1986 State Ceiling on Tax Exempt Private Activity Bonds);

Executive Order No. 38-87 (codified as No. 32-2) dated January 30, 1987 (Interim Allocations of 1987 State Ceiling on Tax Exempt Private Activity Bonds);

Executive Order No. 55-87 (codified as No. 32-5) dated December 29, 1987 (Allocation of 1987 State Ceiling on Tax Exempt Private Activity Bonds);

Executive Order No. 14-11 (codified as No. 32-9) dated November 2, 2011 (Private Activity Bond Advisory Committee), superseded by

32 V.S.A. § 994
.

Effective Date.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated February 13, 2015